North Carolina, session 2025, SB972.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Findings/Purpose. – The General Assembly finds that advances in
technology and service delivery will enhance State government efficiency and effectiveness. A
managed reduction in budgets will provide the flexibility to scale into these advances and
efficiencies. The purpose of this act is to ensure structural savings in State agency costs achieved
by reducing budgets by ten percent (10%).
SECTION 2. Budget Reduction Requirement. – By June 30, 2028, the total budgets
of State agencies shall be reduced by not less than ten percent (10%). The Director is granted
flexibility to administer cost reduction to mitigate any substantial burden affecting agencies,
provided that the overall reduction percentage reaches the ten percent (10%) target.
SECTION 3. Agency Implementation Plans. – By January 1, 2027, each State
agency head shall submit to the Director a detailed budget reduction implementation plan
specifying each agency's ten percent (10%) reduction target methodology. The Director shall
approve or require revision of each plan by no later than February 1, 2027, and shall publish
approved plans on the Office of State Budget and Management's website.
SECTION 4. Reporting. – By October 1, 2027, the Director shall report to the Fiscal
Research Division regarding progress made in complying with this act.
SECTION 5. Appropriation. – Effective July 1, 2026, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Office of State Budget and Management the sum of two hundred thousand
dollars ($200,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to implement this act.
SECTION 6. Effective Date. – Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective
when it becomes law.
*S972-v-1*